Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201918-2515
Petition; contents.

(1) Each petition presented for signature must be identical to the petition authorized for circulation by the city clerk pursuant to section 18-2512.

(2) Every petition shall contain the name and place of residence of not more than three persons as chief petitioners or sponsors of the measure.

(3) Every petition shall contain the caption and the statement specified in subdivisions (1)(a) and (1)(c) of section 18-2513.

(4) When a special election is being requested, such fact shall be stated on every petition.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 15;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 444, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 21.
September 1, 2019